North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 6. Department of Justice.

§ 143A-49.
Creation.

There is hereby created a Department of Justice. The head of the Department of Justice is the Attorney General.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 8.

§ 143A-49.1.
Attorney General; powers and duties.

The Attorney General shall have such powers and duties as are conferred on him by this Chapter, delegated to him by the Governor, and conferred by the Constitution and laws of this State.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 8.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1984 administrative law, “A Declining Role for the Attorney General,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 1051 (1985).

§ 143A-50.
Attorney General; transfer of powers and duties to Department.

Except as otherwise provided in the Constitution or in this Chapter, all powers, duties and functions vested by law in the Attorney General are transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Justice.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 8.

§ 143A-51.
State Bureau of Investigation; transfer.

The State Bureau of Investigation, as contained in Article 4 of Chapter 114 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Justice.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 8.

§ 143A-52.
Fire investigations; transfer.

The duties of the Commissioner of Insurance with respect to the investigation of all fires, including forest fires, as contained in Article 1 of Chapter 69 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, are hereby transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Justice; provided, however, that the duties of the Commissioner of Insurance with respect to the inspection of buildings, the removal of dangerous materials therefrom, hospital insurance, insurance regulation, and the preparation of annual reports, as contained in Chapters 57 and 58 of the General Statutes and G.S. 69-4, shall continue to be among the duties of the Commissioner of Insurance.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 8; 1977, c. 596, s. 3.

§ 143A-53.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-97, s. 10, effective June 1, 2011.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 8; repealed by 2011-97, s. 10, effective June 1, 2011.

§ 143A-54.
Company police; powers, duties and functions; transfer.

All of the powers, duties and functions of the Governor contained in Chapter 74A of the General Statutes and the laws of this State relating to the appointment and commission of special police are hereby transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Justice.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 8.

§ 143A-55.
Police information Network; transfer.

The Police Information Network, as created by G.S. 114-10.1 and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Justice.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 8.

§ 143A-55.1.
North Carolina Criminal Justice Training and Standards Council; transfer.

The North Carolina Criminal Justice Training and Standards Council, as created by Chapter 17A of the General Statutes and laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of Justice.

History.

1975, c. 372, s. 1.

§ 143A-55.2.
North Carolina Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission; transfer.

The North Carolina Sheriffs’ Education and Training Standards Commission, as created by Chapter 17E of the General Statutes and laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer as defined in

G.S. 143A-6(b)

to the Department of Justice.

History.

1983, c. 558, s. 4.

§§ 143A-55.3 through 143A-55.7.
[Repealed]

Not effectuated.

Cross References.

As to the Rules Review Commission, see now G.S. 143B-30.1 et seq.